Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-2414
Suspension or revocation of recurrent authorization to
operate; procedure; hearing; commission; powers.

Any postsecondary
institution with a recurrent authorization to
operate which ceases to meet any of the requirements of the Postsecondary
Institution Act, any rules or regulations adopted and promulgated under the
act, or any terms or conditions specified by the commission for authorization
to operate under the act shall be notified in writing of any such specific
deficiency by certified mail. A hearing shall be scheduled requiring the institution
to show cause why the authorization to operate should not be suspended or
revoked. The hearing shall be held according to the Administrative Procedure
Act. After the hearing, if the commission determines that any requirements,
rules or regulations, or terms and conditions have been violated, the commission
may suspend or revoke the recurrent authorization
to operate or may require action as a condition of continued authorization.

Laws 2011, LB637, § 14;

Laws 2012, LB1104, § 20.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.